Virginia statutes. Title 29.1. Wildlife, Inland Fisheries and Boating.
Article 3. Special Permits.

§ 29.1-412.
Permits required.

It shall be unlawful to exercise any privilege of the permits provided in this article without first having obtained the required permit.

Any person who violates any provision of this article shall be guilty of a Class 4 misdemeanor, and the permit shall be revoked.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 29-103, 29-116; 1962, c. 469; 1968, c. 242; 1987, c. 488.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 4 misdemeanors, see §

18.2-11

.

§ 29.1-413.
Issuance discretionary, duration.

The issuance of all of the permits provided by this article shall be within the discretion of the Board, under regulations it may prescribe, and contingent on reports as it may require. The Board is authorized to establish a starting and ending date for each type of permit issued under this article and the number of years for which each type of permit may be issued.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 29-104, 29-105; 1987, c. 488; 1997, c. 57.

§ 29.1-414.
Reserved.

§ 29.1-415.
Taxidermy; sale of specimens.

The fee for a permit to stuff or mount birds, animals, fish or parts thereof, for compensation or for sale shall be forty dollars per year. The Board may promulgate regulations pertaining to the sale of unclaimed or mounted specimens or parts thereof.

History.

Code 1950, § 29-109; 1980, c. 494; 1987, c. 488; 1988, c. 250; 1994, c. 194; 1997, c. 57.

§ 29.1-416.
Netting fish.

The fee for a permit to net fish in inland waters, for private table use, or for sale where permitted, shall be as follows:

County dip net, three dollars and fifty cents each per year;

Gill net, eight dollars each per year;

Haul seine, seventeen dollars and fifty cents each per year; and

Haul seine to catch species designated by the Board for sale, forty-five dollars each per year.

The Board may permit a licensee to use dip nets or gill nets to take for sale fish of any designated species in the waters of Back Bay and its tributaries. However, any nonresident desiring to take or catch fish in Back Bay and its tributaries for which a permit is required and where such fishing is not prohibited, shall first pay $350 per year to the Department for a nonresident harvester’s permit. Such a permit shall be required for each boat used to take or catch fish in Back Bay and its tributaries, and shall be in addition to any other permit required for the activity involved.

History.

Code 1950, § 29-110; 1956, c. 343; 1974, c. 363; 1987, c. 488; 1988, c. 250; 1989, c. 692; 1997, c. 57.

§ 29.1-416.1.
Use of eel pots in the waters of Back Bay and its tributaries.

The Board may permit a licensee to use eel pots to take American eels in the waters of Back Bay and North Landing River and their tributaries for sale or private use.

The annual fee for a permit to set eel pots in the waters of Back Bay and North Landing River and their tributaries for the purpose of taking American eels for private use or for sale shall be as follows:

Eel pots to catch eels for sale, $50; and

Eel pots to catch eels for personal use, $17.50.

Any nonresident desiring to take or catch American eels in the waters of Back Bay and North Landing River and their tributaries using eel pots shall first pay $350 per year to the Department for a nonresident harvester’s permit, unless he has paid a permit fee pursuant to subsection B of §

29.1-416

. A separate nonresident harvester’s permit shall be required for each boat used to take or harvest American eels in the waters of Back Bay and North Landing River and their tributaries, and shall be in addition to any other permit required for the activity involved.

History.

2013, c. 706.

§ 29.1-417.
Capturing, holding, propagating, and disposing of wildlife for authorized purposes.

The fee for a permit to capture, hold, propagate, and dispose of wildlife for purposes authorized by the Board shall be an amount sufficient to defray the costs of processing the permit and administering the permitted activity. However, in no instance shall the fees established by the Board exceed the following:

For endangered species, scientific collection and wildlife holder, $20 per year; and

For all other such permits, $50 per year.

The Board shall establish a permit to authorize the permittee to artificially raise trout, catfish, or largemouth bass and other members of the sunfish family for sale from a privately owned facility. Where the permittee allows public fishing from its facilities, if the fee provided for in subsection A has been paid, no license shall be required to fish from such a facility.

The Board shall establish standards for the possession and display of wildlife by elementary or secondary school teachers for educational purposes. No permit fee or application shall be required, and such display shall be deemed to be permitted so long as notification of the display is made to the Department and the exhibit is in compliance with the standards established by the Board. The Board’s standards may include species permitted to be possessed and displayed, caging and enclosure requirements, prohibitions on release of wildlife, and notification requirements in the case of wildlife sickness or escape.

History.

1980, c. 494, § 29-111.1; 1987, c. 488; 1988, c. 250; 1993, c. 623; 1995, c. 610; 1997, c. 57; 2013, c. 792; 2015, c. 463.

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendment by c. 792 added the subsection A designator and deleted a comma following “Board” in the first sentence of the first paragraph thereof, and added subsection B.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 463 inserted the subsection B designation and rewrote the former paragraph, which read “The permit shall also authorize the permittee to artificially raise trout or catfish for sale from a privately owned facility where the permittee allows public fishing from its facilities. If this fee has been paid, no license shall be required to fish from such a facility”; and redesignated former subsection B as subsection C.

§ 29.1-418.
Collecting specimens.

The fee for a permit to collect specimens of fish, wild birds, wild animals and amphibians, in limited quantity, for scientific or museum purposes shall be established pursuant to §

29.1-417

. Such permits may be issued to collect a certain number of specimens of one or more designated species when the collection is shown to be an essential part of a specific research project.

History.

Code 1950, § 29-113; 1980, c. 494; 1987, c. 488; 1993, c. 623.

§ 29.1-419.
Taking or holding of falcons, hawks and owls; use to hunt wild game.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the Director may:

Permit the taking, trapping, holding, transportation, carriage and shipment of live falcons, hawks and owls. The initial fee or the fee for nonconsecutive years for this permit shall be $50. The fee for subsequent consecutive years shall be $20 per year.

Authorize the use of falcons, hawks and owls to hunt and take all species of wild birds and wild animals. However, the hunting of migratory game birds shall be in accordance with §

29.1-515

, and appropriate hunting licenses shall be required as provided in Chapter 3 (§

29.1-300

et seq.) of this title.

History.

1964, c. 345, § 29-114.2; 1977, c. 377; 1978, c. 331; 1987, c. 488; 1997, c. 57; 2011, c. 191.

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendment by c. 191, in subdivision 1, deleted “and the permit shall entitle the holder to possess not more than three of any such birds at any one time” from the end of the first sentence, and made minor stylistic changes.

§ 29.1-420.
From whom permits obtained.

The permits provided for in this article may be obtained from the Department except that county dip net permits shall be sold by clerks and agents.

History.

Code 1950, § 29-115; 1987, c. 488.

§ 29.1-421.
Reserved.

§ 29.1-422.
Permits for field trials.

The Board is authorized to grant permits to bona fide field trial clubs and associations to hold field trials with dogs under such regulations it deems proper. The fee established by the Board for a field trial permit shall be an amount sufficient to defray the costs of processing the permit and administering the permitted activity, but shall not exceed twenty-five dollars per event.
It shall be unlawful to hold such trials without the permit herein authorized during the closed season for game. If wild game is to be shot over or in front of dogs engaged in such field trials, the person actually shooting must have a license permitting him to do so.

Captive birds of any species released and immediately shot or recovered during such trials shall not be considered to be wild birds under this chapter or §

29.1-521

.

History.

1984, c. 492, § 29-213.96; 1987, c. 488; 1993, c. 623.

Cross references.

As to penalties for offenses involving animals, see §

18.2-403.3

.